Hawaii statutes.
§465D-7 Exemptions. (a) This chapter
is not intended to restrict the practice of other licensed or credentialed
practitioners practicing within their own recognized scopes of practice and
shall not apply to:

(1) An individual working within the scope of
practice or duties of another licensed profession that overlaps with the
practice of behavior analysis; provided that the person does not purport to be
a behavior analyst;

(2) An individual who implements or designs applied
behavior analysis services and possesses board certification as an assistant
behavior analyst by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board and who practices
in accordance with the most recent supervisory and ethical requirements adopted
by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board under the direction of a behavior
analyst licensed in this State;

(3) An individual who directly implements applied
behavior analysis services and:

(A) Is credentialed as a registered behavior
technician by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, and is under the
direction of a behavior analyst licensed in this State;

(B) Is a direct support worker who provides
autism treatment services pursuant to an individualized education plan on or
before January 1, 2019; [or]

[(C)] Is a direct support worker who provides
medicaid home and community-based services pursuant to section 1915(c) of the
Social Security Act on or before January 1, 2019;

provided that for purposes of this paragraph,
"direct support worker" means a teacher or paraprofessional who
directly implements intervention or assessment plans under supervision and does
not design intervention or assessment plans;

(4) A family member or legal guardian implementing an
applied behavior analysis plan and who acts under the direction of a behavior
analyst licensed in this State;

(5) An individual who engages in the practice of
behavior analysis with nonhuman or nonpatient clients or consumers including
but not limited to applied animal behaviorists and practitioners of
organizational behavior management;

(6) A matriculated graduate student or postdoctoral
fellow whose activities are part of a defined behavior analysis program of
study, practicum, or intensive practicum; provided that the student's or
fellow's activities or practice is directly supervised by a behavior analyst
licensed in this State or an instructor in a Behavior Analyst Certification
Board-approved course sequence; or

(7) An individual pursuing experience in behavior
analysis consistent with the Behavior Analyst Certification Board's experience
requirements; provided that the experience is supervised by a behavior analyst
licensed in this State.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prevent any licensed psychologist from engaging in the practice of behavior
analysis in this State as long as the person is not in any manner held out to
the public as a "licensed behavior analyst" or "behavior
analyst" and the behavior analysis services provided by the licensed
psychologist are within the licensed psychologist's recognized scope of
practice. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 107, §2 and c 123, §3]

Note

The L 2016, c 123, §3 amendment applies retroactive to
January 1, 2016. L 2016, c 123, §5.

Department of education; reports to 2017-2018 legislature on
progress in complying with licensure and certification requirements of this
chapter. L 2016, c 107, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next